Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Part 1

General Provisions

45-13-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act.”

Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 13, §§45-13-101—45-13-129 (Acts 1988, ch. 846, §§ 1-18; 1990, ch. 788, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 629, § 1; 2001, ch. 165, §§ 10-20; 2003, ch. 141, §§ 1-3; 2004, ch. 747, §§ 1-10; 2005, ch. 463, § 1; 2008, ch. 821, §§ 1-3, 5-9), concerning the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act of 1988, was repealed and replaced by the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act by Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8, effective July 31, 2009. See this chapter for current provisions.

Cross-References. Duties of mortgagee or lender, title 47, ch. 23.

Home equity conversion mortgages, title 47, ch. 30.

Interest on home loans, title 47, ch. 15.

Interest rates generally, title 47, ch. 14.

Open-end mortgages and mortgages securing future advances, title 47, ch. 28.

Residential Closing Funds Distribution Act of 2005, title 47, ch. 32.

Attorney General Opinions. Effect of regulations issued by the comptroller of the currency, OAG 04-057, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 55 (4/06/04).

45-13-102. Purpose.

The origination or offering of financing for residential real property has a direct, valuable and immediate impact upon Tennessee's consumers, Tennessee's economy, the neighborhoods and communities of this state and the housing and real estate industry. The general assembly finds that accessibility to mortgage credit is vital to the state's citizens. It is the purpose of this chapter to ensure a sound system of making residential mortgage loans through the licensing, examination and regulation of mortgage lenders, mortgage loan brokers, mortgage loan servicers and mortgage loan originators. It is also the purpose of this chapter to carry out the purposes and to be compliant with the requirements of the federal Secure and Fair Enforcement for Mortgage Licensing Act of 2008 (12 U.S.C. § 5101 et seq.).

Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 13, §§45-13-101—45-13-129 (Acts 1988, ch. 846, §§ 1-18; 1990, ch. 788, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 629, § 1; 2001, ch. 165, §§ 10-20; 2003, ch. 141, §§ 1-3; 2004, ch. 747, §§ 1-10; 2005, ch. 463, § 1; 2008, ch. 821, §§ 1-3, 5-9), concerning the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act of 1988, was repealed and replaced by the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act by Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8, effective July 31, 2009. See this chapter for current provisions.

45-13-103. Administrative authority.

The commissioner is granted broad administrative authority to administer, interpret and enforce this chapter and to promulgate reasonable substantive and procedural rules and regulations to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 13, §§45-13-101—45-13-129 (Acts 1988, ch. 846, §§ 1-18; 1990, ch. 788, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 629, § 1; 2001, ch. 165, §§ 10-20; 2003, ch. 141, §§ 1-3; 2004, ch. 747, §§ 1-10; 2005, ch. 463, § 1; 2008, ch. 821, §§ 1-3, 5-9), concerning the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act of 1988, was repealed and replaced by the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act by Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8, effective July 31, 2009. See this chapter for current provisions.

45-13-104. Provisions remedial.

This chapter is declared to be remedial in nature, and this chapter shall be liberally construed to effectuate the purpose of this chapter.

Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 13, §§45-13-101—45-13-129 (Acts 1988, ch. 846, §§ 1-18; 1990, ch. 788, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 629, § 1; 2001, ch. 165, §§ 10-20; 2003, ch. 141, §§ 1-3; 2004, ch. 747, §§ 1-10; 2005, ch. 463, § 1; 2008, ch. 821, §§ 1-3, 5-9), concerning the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act of 1988, was repealed and replaced by the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act by Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8, effective July 31, 2009. See this chapter for current provisions.

45-13-105. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Branch manager” means the individual whose principal office is physically located in, who is in charge of and who is responsible for the business operations of a branch office of a mortgage lender or mortgage loan broker licensed under this chapter;

“Branch office” means an office of a licensed mortgage lender or mortgage loan broker that is separate and distinct from the licensee's principal place of business;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of financial institutions or the commissioner's designated representative;

“Control” means possession, direct or indirect, of the power to direct or cause the direction of management and policies of a person, whether through the ownership of voting securities by contract or otherwise; provided, that no individual shall be deemed to control a person solely on account of being a director, officer or employee of the person. For purposes of this section, a person who, directly or indirectly, owns, controls, holds the power to vote, or holds proxies representing twenty-five percent (25%) or more of the then outstanding voting securities issued by another person is presumed to control the other person. For purposes of this section, the commissioner may determine whether a person, in fact, controls another person;

“Depository institution” has the same meaning as in § 3 of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act (12 U.S.C. § 1813), and includes any credit union;

“Federal banking agencies” means the board of governors of the federal reserve system, the comptroller of the currency, the director of the office of thrift supervision, the national credit union administration and the federal deposit insurance corporation;

“Immediate family member” means a spouse, child, sibling, parent, grandparent or grandchild. This includes stepparents, stepchildren, stepsiblings and adoptive relationships;

“Individual” means a natural person;

“License” means a license issued to a mortgage lender, mortgage loan broker, mortgage loan servicer or mortgage loan originator under this chapter, as applicable;

“Licensee” means a person to whom a license has been issued under this chapter, whether a mortgage lender, mortgage loan broker, mortgage loan servicer or mortgage loan originator, as applicable, but “licensee” also applies to any person holding a certificate of registration on July 31, 2009, for so long as the certificate is still valid;

In general, “loan processor or underwriter” means an individual who performs clerical or support duties as an employee at the direction of and subject to the supervision and instruction of a person licensed or exempt from licensing under § 45-13-201;

For purposes of subdivision (11)(A), “clerical or support duties” includes, subsequent to the receipt of an application:

The receipt, collection, distribution and analysis of information common for the processing or underwriting of a residential mortgage loan; and/or

Communicating with a consumer to obtain the information necessary for the processing or underwriting of a loan, to the extent that the communication does not include offering or negotiating loan rates or terms, or counseling consumers about residential mortgage loan rates or terms;

“Loss mitigation specialist” means an individual employed by a mortgage lender or mortgage loan servicer licensed under this chapter, or by a registrant authorized to make residential mortgage loans under the Industrial Loan and Thrift Companies Act, compiled in chapter 5 of this title, whose activities are confined to the negotiation of terms of an existing residential mortgage loan owned or being serviced by that licensee or registrant for purposes of modifying the terms of the loan, such as by reducing the interest rate or extending the term of the loan, when the modification is done for purposes of avoiding or curing default; provided, that “negotiates terms of an existing residential mortgage loan” as used in this subdivision (12) shall not include the negotiation of the refinancing of the loan;

“Managing principal” means an individual who agrees to be primarily responsible for the operations of a licensed mortgage lender or mortgage loan broker;

“Mortgage lender” means any person who makes a residential mortgage loan or holds the person out as able to make a residential mortgage loan;

“Mortgage loan broker” means any person who for compensation or other gain, paid directly or indirectly, or in expectation of compensation or other gain, solicits, places, negotiates or originates a residential mortgage loan for another person or offers to solicit, place, negotiate or originate a residential mortgage loan for another person or who closes a residential mortgage loan that may be in the mortgage loan broker's own name with funds provided by another person and which loan is thereafter assigned to the person providing the funding of the loan, regardless of whether the acts are done directly or indirectly, through contact by telephone, by electronic means, by mail or in person with the borrower or borrowers or potential borrower or borrowers;

In general, “mortgage loan originator”:

Means an individual who for compensation or gain or in the expectation of compensation or gain:

Takes a residential mortgage loan application; or

Offers or negotiates terms of a residential mortgage loan;

Does not include an individual engaged solely as a loan processor or underwriter except as otherwise provided in §45-13-301(d);

Does not include a person or entity that only performs real estate brokerage activities and is licensed or registered in accordance with Tennessee law, unless the person or entity is compensated by a mortgage lender, mortgage loan broker, or other mortgage loan originator or by any agent of the mortgage lender, mortgage loan broker or other mortgage loan originator; and

Does not include a person or entity solely involved in extensions of credit relating to timeshare plans, as defined in 11 U.S.C. § 101(53D);

For purposes of subdivision (16)(A), “real estate brokerage activities” means any activity that involves offering or providing real estate brokerage services to the public, including:

Acting as a real estate agent or real estate broker for a buyer, seller, lessor or lessee of real property;

Bringing together parties interested in the sale, purchase, lease, rental or exchange of real property;

Negotiating, on behalf of any party, any portion of a contract relating to the sale, purchase, lease, rental or exchange of real property, other than in connection with providing financing with respect to the transaction;

Engaging in any activity for which a person engaged in the activity is required to be registered or licensed as a real estate agent or real estate broker under any applicable law; and

Offering to engage in any activity, or act in any capacity, described in subdivision (16)(B)(i), (16)(B)(ii), (16)(B)(iii) or (16)(B)(iv);

“Mortgage loan servicer” means any person who, in the regular course of business, assumes responsibility for servicing and accepting payments for a residential mortgage loan;

“Mortgagor” means any person who grants a mortgage, deed of trust or other equivalent consensual security interest pursuant to a residential mortgage loan transaction;

“Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry” means a mortgage licensing system developed and maintained by the Conference of State Bank Supervisors and the American Association of Residential Mortgage Regulators for the licensing and registration of licensed mortgage loan originators;

“Nontraditional mortgage product” means any mortgage product other than a thirty-year fixed rate residential mortgage loan;

“Origination services” means the activities of a mortgage loan originator performed with regard to a residential mortgage loan;

“Person” means an individual, sole proprietorship, corporation, limited liability company, partnership, trust, association or any other legal entity, however organized;

“Registered mortgage loan originator” means any individual who:

Meets the definition of mortgage loan originator and is an employee of:

A depository institution;

A subsidiary that is:

Owned and controlled by a depository institution; and

Regulated by a federal banking agency; or

An institution regulated by the farm credit administration; and

Is registered with, and maintains a unique identifier through, the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry;

“Registrant” has the same meaning as defined in §45-5-102 of the Industrial Loan and Thrift Companies Act, compiled in chapter 5 of this title;

“Residential mortgage loan” means any loan, including an extension of credit, primarily for personal, family or household use that is secured by a mortgage, deed of trust or other equivalent consensual security interest on a dwelling, as defined in § 103(v) of the federal Truth in Lending Act (15 U.S.C. § 1602(v)), or residential real estate upon which is constructed or intended to be constructed a dwelling, as so defined;

“Residential real estate” means any real property located in this state, upon which is constructed or intended to be constructed a dwelling; and

“Unique identifier” means a number or other identifier assigned by protocols established by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry.

Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 13, §§45-13-101—45-13-129 (Acts 1988, ch. 846, §§ 1-18; 1990, ch. 788, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 629, § 1; 2001, ch. 165, §§ 10-20; 2003, ch. 141, §§ 1-3; 2004, ch. 747, §§ 1-10; 2005, ch. 463, § 1; 2008, ch. 821, §§ 1-3, 5-9), concerning the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act of 1988, was repealed and replaced by the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act by Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8, effective July 31, 2009. See this chapter for current provisions.

Attorney General Opinions. An individual investment property owner who provides a purchaser with financing that qualifies as a “residential mortgage loan” must be licensed under T.C.A. §§45-13-201, et seq., unless a statutory exception applies. Additionally, such an individual who provides such financing for compensation or gain or in the expectation thereof must be licensed under T.C.A. §§45-13-301, et seq., unless a statutory exception applies. OAG 10-93, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 99 (8/24/10).

45-13-106. Certificates of registration and registration certificates.

Any certificate of registration or registration certificate issued by the commissioner under the former provisions of this chapter and outstanding on July 31, 2009, is not renewable, but shall remain valid until and expire on December 31, 2009, unless such authority is extended as provided in subsection (b) or subsection (c), as applicable. Any mortgage lender, mortgage loan broker or mortgage loan servicer holding a certificate of registration shall be considered to hold a license and shall be subject to this chapter as a licensee, except that such persons shall not be required to comply with any of the requirements pertaining to eligibility for a license that were not applicable to their qualification for a certificate, until such time as they are issued a license under this chapter. Any mortgage loan originator holding a valid registration certificate shall be subject to the prohibitions and enforcement mechanisms of this chapter, as well as to investigation and examination under this chapter, including the fingerprint background check provisions under § 45-13-302(f).

A mortgage lender, mortgage loan broker or mortgage loan servicer holding a valid certificate of registration may extend the authority of their certificate; provided, that they have transitioned to the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry by any deadline established by the commissioner, by filing on or before December 31, 2009, a licensure renewal application under § 45-13-203(c), including the requisite surety bond and renewal fee [now “supervision fee”. See Compiler's Notes]. If the renewal application is complete and timely filed, the person shall be authorized to continue to act as a mortgage lender, mortgage loan broker or mortgage loan servicer until such time as the commissioner has acted on the person’s renewal application. If the renewal application is not complete and timely filed, the person's certificate of registration shall expire without further notice or process on December 31, 2009. If the application for a license is approved, the license shall be issued for calendar year 2010.

A mortgage loan originator holding a valid registration certificate may extend the authority of the certificate past December 31, 2009, by filing between November 1, 2009, and December 31, 2009, an application for a license under part 3 of this chapter through the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry, paying all licensing fees and submitting fingerprints for a criminal background check. If the filing of the application, payment of licensing fees and submission of fingerprints is timely accomplished, the registration certificate shall remain valid until such time as the commissioner has acted on the licensure application, but in no event shall the certificate be valid after July 30, 2010. If the licensure application is approved, the license shall be issued for calendar year 2010. Any mortgage loan originator timely filing a licensure application under this subsection (c) shall be considered to be sponsored for purposes of part 3 of this chapter by the mortgage lender or mortgage loan broker named in the registration certificate upon any successive licensure. If a mortgage loan originator does not timely comply with the licensure application requirements of this subsection (c), the registration certificate shall expire without further notice or process on December 31, 2009. A mortgage loan originator holding a valid registration certificate under this subsection (c) shall not be in violation of the licensing requirements under part 3 of this chapter for origination services performed for or on behalf of the mortgage lender or mortgage loan broker named in the certificate; provided, however, that the registration certificate shall expire without further notice or process if the mortgage loan originator provides origination services for a person other than the one named in the registration certificate.

Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 13, §§45-13-101—45-13-129 (Acts 1988, ch. 846, §§ 1-18; 1990, ch. 788, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 629, § 1; 2001, ch. 165, §§ 10-20; 2003, ch. 141, §§ 1-3; 2004, ch. 747, §§ 1-10; 2005, ch. 463, § 1; 2008, ch. 821, §§ 1-3, 5-9), concerning the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act of 1988, was repealed and replaced by the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act by Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8, effective July 31, 2009. See this chapter for current provisions.

As amended by Acts 2014, ch. 736, Section 45-13-203(c) referred to in (b) now requires payment of a “supervision fee” rather than a “renewal fee”.

45-13-107. Lost licenses — Substitutions.

In the event that a license issued under this chapter is lost or destroyed, the person to whom the license was issued may, upon payment of a nonrefundable fee prescribed by the commissioner, obtain a substitute license upon furnishing proof satisfactory to the commissioner that the license has become lost or destroyed.

Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 13, §§45-13-101—45-13-129 (Acts 1988, ch. 846, §§ 1-18; 1990, ch. 788, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 629, § 1; 2001, ch. 165, §§ 10-20; 2003, ch. 141, §§ 1-3; 2004, ch. 747, §§ 1-10; 2005, ch. 463, § 1; 2008, ch. 821, §§ 1-3, 5-9), concerning the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act of 1988, was repealed and replaced by the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act by Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8, effective July 31, 2009. See this chapter for current provisions.

45-13-108. Filing of written report with commissioner — Events impacting activities of licensee.

Within fifteen (15) days of the occurrence of any one (1) of the following events, a licensee shall file a written report with the commissioner describing the event and its expected impact on the activities of the licensee in this state:

The filing for bankruptcy or reorganization by the licensee;

The institution of revocation or suspension proceedings against the licensee by any state or governmental authority;

The denial of the opportunity to engage in business by any state or governmental authority;

Any felony indictment of the licensee or any of its officers, directors or principals;

Any felony conviction of the licensee or any of its officers, directors or principals; and

Other events that the commissioner may determine and identify by rule.

Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 13, §§45-13-101—45-13-129 (Acts 1988, ch. 846, §§ 1-18; 1990, ch. 788, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 629, § 1; 2001, ch. 165, §§ 10-20; 2003, ch. 141, §§ 1-3; 2004, ch. 747, §§ 1-10; 2005, ch. 463, § 1; 2008, ch. 821, §§ 1-3, 5-9), concerning the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act of 1988, was repealed and replaced by the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act by Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8, effective July 31, 2009. See this chapter for current provisions.